Utah statutes.
59-12-1902.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Airline" is as defined in Section 59-2-102.
(2)  "Airport facility" is as defined in Section 59-12-602.
(3)  "Annexation" means an annexation to:
(a)  a county under Title 17, Chapter 2, Annexation to County; or
(b)  a city or town under Title 10, Chapter 2, Part 4, Annexation.
(4)  "Annexing area" means an area that is annexed into a county, city, or
town.
(5)  "Fixed guideway" is as defined in Section 59-12-1702.
(6)  "Local highway of regional significance" means a local highway that is a:
(a)  principal arterial highway as defined in Section 72-4-102.5;
(b)  minor arterial highway as defined in Section 72-4-102.5;
(c)  major collector highway as defined in Section 72-4-102.5; or
(d)  minor collector road as defined in Section 72-4-102.5.
(7)  "Public transit" is as defined in Section 59-12-1502.
